Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-25] Termination of leases
by lessees. (a) This section applies to any lease of premises occupied
for a dwelling, or for professional, business, agricultural, or similar
purposes in any case in which:

(1) The lease was executed by or on the behalf of a
person who, after the execution of the lease, entered military service; and

(2) The leased premises have been occupied for one or
more of those purposes by the person or by the person and the person's
dependents.

(b) Any lease described in subsection (a) may
be terminated by notice in writing delivered to the lessor or the lessor's
grantee or to one of their agents by the lessee at any time following the date
of the beginning of the lessor's or the lessor's grantee's period of military
service. Delivery of the notice may be made by mailing it. Termination of any
such lease providing for monthly payment of rent shall not be effective until
thirty days after the date on which the next rental payment is due and payable
following the date of delivery or mailing of the notice. In the case of all
other leases, termination shall be effected on the last day of the month
following the month in which the notice is delivered or mailed and in such case
any unpaid rental for a period preceding termination shall be computed pro rata
and any rental paid in advance for a period succeeding termination shall be
refunded by the lessor or the lessor's assignee. Upon application by the
lessor to the appropriate court prior to the termination period provided for in
the notice, any relief granted in this subsection shall be subject to such
modifications or restrictions the court may find in the interests of justice
and equity.

(c) Any person who knowingly seizes, holds, or
retains the personal effects, clothing, furniture, or other property of any
person who has lawfully terminated a lease covered by this section, or in any
manner interferes with the removal of such property from the premises covered
by such lease, for the purpose of subjecting or attempting to subject any such
property to a claim for rent accruing subsequent to the date of termination of
such lease, or attempts to do so, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1994, c
257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next